Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Children’s Proceedings.
Sec. 47.10.086.
Reasonable efforts.

Except as provided in (b), (c), and (g) of this section, the department shall make timely, reasonable efforts to provide family support services to the child and to the parents or guardian of the child that are designed to prevent out-of-home placement of the child or to enable the safe return of the child to the family home, when appropriate, if the child is in an out-of-home placement. The department’s duty to make reasonable efforts under this subsection includes the duty to

identify family support services that will assist the parent or guardian in remedying the conduct or conditions in the home that made the child a child in need of aid;

actively offer the parent or guardian, and refer the parent or guardian to, the services identified under (1) of this subsection; the department shall refer the parent or guardian to, and distribute to the parent or guardian information on, community-based family support services whenever community- based services are available and desired by the parent or guardian; the information may include the use of a power of attorney under AS

13.26.066

to select an individual to care for the child temporarily; and

document the department’s actions that are taken under (1) and (2) of this subsection.

If the court makes a finding at a hearing conducted under AS

47.10.080(l)

that a parent or guardian has not sufficiently remedied the parent’s or guardian’s conduct or the conditions in the home despite reasonable efforts made by the department in accordance with this section, the court may conclude that continuation of reasonable efforts of the type described in (a) of this section are not in the best interests of the child. The department shall then make reasonable efforts to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanent plan and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

The court may determine that reasonable efforts of the type described in (a) of this section are not required if the court has found by clear and convincing evidence that

the parent or guardian has subjected the child to circumstances that pose a substantial risk to the child’s health or safety; these circumstances include abandonment, sexual abuse, torture, chronic mental injury, or chronic physical harm;

the parent or guardian has

committed homicide under AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.130

of a parent of the child or of a child;

aided or abetted, attempted, conspired, or solicited under AS 11.16 or AS 11.31 to commit a homicide described in (A) of this paragraph;

committed an assault that is a felony under AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.220

and results in serious physical injury to a child; or

committed the conduct described in (A) — (C) of this paragraph that violated a law or ordinance of another jurisdiction having elements similar to an offense described in (A) — (C) of this paragraph;

the parent or guardian has, during the 12 months preceding the permanency hearing, failed to comply with a court order to participate in family support services;

the department has conducted a reasonably diligent search over a time period of at least three months for an unidentified or absent parent and has failed to identify and locate the parent;

the parent or guardian is the sole caregiver of the child and the parent or guardian has a mental illness or mental deficiency of such nature and duration that, according to the statement of a psychologist or physician, the parent or guardian will be incapable of caring for the child without placing the child at substantial risk of physical or mental injury even if the department were to provide family support services to the parent or guardian for 12 months;

the parent or guardian has previously been convicted of a crime involving a child in this state or in another jurisdiction and, after the conviction, the child was returned to the custody of the parent or guardian and later removed because of an additional substantiated report of physical or sexual abuse by the parent or guardian;

a child has suffered substantial physical harm as the result of abusive or neglectful conduct by the parent or guardian or by a person known by the parent or guardian and the parent or guardian knew or reasonably should have known that the person was abusing the child;

the parental rights of the parent have been terminated with respect to another child because of child abuse or neglect, the parent has not remedied the conditions or conduct that led to the termination of parental rights, and the parent has demonstrated an inability to protect the child from substantial harm or the risk of substantial harm;

the child has been removed from the child’s home on at least two previous occasions, family support services were offered or provided to the parent or guardian at those times, and the parent or guardian has demonstrated an inability to protect the child from substantial harm or the risk of substantial harm;

the parent or guardian is incarcerated and is unavailable to care for the child during a significant period of the child’s minority, considering the child’s age and need for care by an adult; or

the parent or guardian

has sexually abused the child or another child of the parent or guardian; or

is registered or required to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper under AS 12.63.

If the court determines under (b) or (c) of this section that reasonable efforts under (a) of this section are not required to be provided,

the court shall hold a permanency hearing for the child within 30 days after the determination; and

the department shall make reasonable efforts to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan, and complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

The department may develop and implement an alternative permanency plan for the child while the department is also making reasonable efforts to return the child to the child’s family under (a) of this section.

In making determinations and reasonable efforts under this section, the primary consideration is the child’s best interests.

The department is not required to make reasonable efforts of the type described in (a) of this section if the department took emergency custody of an infant under AS

47.10.142

after the infant was abandoned safely within the meaning of AS

47.10.013(c)

.

The department shall engage a child who is 14 years of age or older in the development or revision of a case plan, permanency goal, or alternative permanency plan for the child. The department shall also allow the child to select not more than two adults to participate in the development or revision of the plan in addition to the child’s foster parents or department employees who are supervising the care of the child. The department may reject an adult selected by the child if the department has good cause to believe that the adult will not act in the best interests of the child. If the department rejects an adult, the child may select another adult. The child may designate one of the adults to be the child’s advisor, and the advisor may advocate for the child.

History.

(§ 33 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2006; am §§ 4, 5 ch 1 SLA 2008; am § 38 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § 5 ch 28 SLA 2016; am § 10 ch 15 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, in paragraph (a)(2) "AS

13.26.066

" was substituted for "AS 13.26.023" in two places to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Cross references. —

For purpose and intent in enacting this section, including the purpose of overriding certain court decisions, see § 1, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts. For effect of this section on the Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, see § 76, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

For effect of the 2006 amendment of (c) of this section on the Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, see § 11, ch. 20, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

For provision relating to applicability of subsection (h), see sec. 22(a), ch. 15, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 4, 2006, substituted “clear and convincing evidence” for “a preponderance of the evidence” in the introductory language of subsection (c).

The 2008 amendment, effective May 11, 2008, substituted “(b), (c), and (g)” for “(b) and (c)” in the first sentence of subsection (a), and added subsection (g).

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (c)(11), and made a related change.

The 2016 amendment, effective September 20, 2016, in (a)(2), inserted “, and distribute to the parent or guardian information on,” preceding “community-based family” and inserted “the information may include the use of a power of attorney under AS 13.26.023 to select an individual to care for the child temporarily;” at the end of the paragraph.

The 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, added (h).

Editor's notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that this section applies to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

Under sec. 12,
ch. 20, SLA 2006, the 2006 amendment of (c) of this section applies “to a child in need of aid proceeding that is pending before the court, that is on appeal to the court, or for which the time for appeal to the court has not yet passed on or after May 4, 2006.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Sec. 47.10.087.
Placement in secure residential psychiatric treatment centers.

The court may authorize the department to place a child who is in the custody of the department under AS

47.10.080(c)(1)

or (3) or

47.10.142

in a secure residential psychiatric treatment center if the court finds, based on the testimony of a mental health professional, that

the child is gravely disabled or is suffering from mental illness and, as a result, is likely to cause serious harm to the child or to another person;

there is no reasonably available, appropriate, and less restrictive alternative for the child’s treatment or that less restrictive alternatives have been tried and have failed; and

there is reason to believe that the child’s mental condition could be improved by the course of treatment or would deteriorate if untreated.

A court shall review a placement made under this section at least once every 90 days. The court may authorize the department to continue the placement of the child in a secure residential psychiatric treatment center if the court finds, based on the testimony of a mental health professional, that the conditions or symptoms that resulted in the initial order have not ameliorated to such an extent that the child’s needs can be met in a less restrictive setting and that the child’s mental condition could be improved by the course of treatment or would deteriorate if untreated.

The department shall transfer a child from a secure residential psychiatric treatment center to another appropriate placement if the mental health professional responsible for the child’s treatment determines that the child would no longer benefit from the course of treatment or that the child’s treatment needs could be met in a less restrictive setting. The department shall notify the child, the child’s parents or guardian, and the child’s guardian ad litem of a determination and transfer made under this subsection.

In this section, “likely to cause serious harm” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For residential psychiatric treatment centers, see 7 AAC 50, art. 9.

Sec. 47.10.088.
Involuntary termination of parental rights and responsibilities.

Except as provided in AS

47.10.080(o)

, the rights and responsibilities of the parent regarding the child may be terminated for purposes of freeing a child for adoption or other permanent placement if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that

the child has been subjected to conduct or conditions described in AS

47.10.011

;

the parent

has not remedied the conduct or conditions in the home that place the child at substantial risk of harm; or

has failed, within a reasonable time, to remedy the conduct or conditions in the home that place the child in substantial risk so that returning the child to the parent would place the child at substantial risk of physical or mental injury; and

the department has complied with the provisions of AS

47.10.086

concerning reasonable efforts.

In making a determination under (a)(2) of this section, the court may consider any fact relating to the best interests of the child, including

the likelihood of returning the child to the parent within a reasonable time based on the child’s age or needs;

the amount of effort by the parent to remedy the conduct or the conditions in the home;

the harm caused to the child;

the likelihood that the harmful conduct will continue; and

the history of conduct by or conditions created by the parent.

In a proceeding under this chapter involving termination of the parental right of a parent, the court shall consider the best interests of the child.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, the department shall petition for termination of a parent’s rights to a child, without making further reasonable efforts, when a child is under the jurisdiction of the court under AS

47.10.010

and

47.10.011

, and

the child has been in foster care for at least 15 of the most recent 22 months;

the court has determined that the child is abandoned under AS

47.10.013

and the child is younger than six years of age;

the court has made a finding under AS

47.10.086(b)

or a determination under AS

47.10.086(c)

that the best interests of the child do not require further reasonable efforts by the department;

a parent has made three or more attempts within a 15-month period to remedy the parent’s conduct or conditions in the home without lasting change; or

a parent has made no effort to remedy the parent’s conduct or the conditions in the home by the time of the permanency hearing under AS

47.10.080(l)

.

If one or more of the conditions listed in (d) of this section are present, the department shall petition for termination of the parental rights to a child unless the department

has documented a compelling reason for determining that filing the petition would not be in the best interests of the child; a compelling reason under this paragraph may include care by a relative for the child; or

is required to make reasonable efforts under AS

47.10.086

and the department has not provided to the parent, consistent with the time period in the department’s case plan, the family support services that the department has determined are necessary for the safe return of the child to the home.

A child is considered to have entered foster care under this chapter on the earlier of

the date of the first judicial finding of child abuse or neglect; or

60 days after the date of removal of the child from the child’s home under this chapter.

This section does not preclude the department from filing a petition to terminate the parental rights and responsibilities to a child for other reasons, or at an earlier time than those specified in (d) of this section, if the department determines that filing a petition is in the best interests of the child.

The court may order the termination of parental rights and responsibilities of one or both parents under AS

47.10.080(c)(3)

and commit the child to the custody of the department. The rights of one parent may be terminated without affecting the rights of the other parent.

The department shall concurrently identify, recruit, process, and approve a qualified person or family for an adoption whenever a petition to terminate a parent’s rights to a child is filed. Before identifying a placement of the child in an adoptive home, the department shall attempt to locate all living adult family members of the child and, if an adult family member expresses an interest in adopting the child, investigate the adult family member’s ability to care for the child. The department shall provide to all adult family members of the child located by the department written notice of the adult family members’ rights under this chapter and of the procedures necessary to gain custody of the child, but the department’s obligation to provide written notice under this subsection does not apply to a parent of the child whose parental rights are being or have been terminated or to an adult family member who is known by the department to be ineligible for a foster care license under AS 47.32 and regulations adopted under AS 47.32. If an adult family member of the child requests that the department approve the adult family member for an adoption, the department shall approve the request unless there is good cause not to approve the adoption. If the court issues an order to terminate under (j) of this section, the department shall report within 30 days on the efforts being made to recruit a permanent placement for the child if a permanent placement was not approved at the time of the trial under (j) of this section. The report must document recruitment efforts made for the child.

No later than six months after the date on which the petition to terminate parental rights is filed, the court before which the petition is pending shall hold a trial on the petition unless the court finds that good cause is shown for a continuance. When determining whether to grant a continuance for good cause, the court shall take into consideration the age of the child and the potential adverse effect that the delay may have on the child. The court shall make written findings when granting a continuance.

The court shall issue an order on the petition to terminate within 90 days after the last day of the trial on the petition to terminate parental rights.

History.

(§ 33 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 16 ch 64 SLA 2005; am §§ 2, 3 ch 20 SLA 2006; am § 52 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For effect of subsections (j) and (k) on the Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, see § 77, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts. For intent and purpose of the enactment of this section, including overriding certain cases concerning termination of parental rights, see § 1, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

For effect of the 2006 amendment of (a) and (b) of this section on the Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, see § 11, ch. 20, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, added the second through fourth sentences in subsection (i).

The 2006 amendment, effective May 4, 2006, made designation changes within subsection (a), deleted “by a preponderance of the evidence that” at the beginning of present paragraph (a)(3), and made related changes.

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “AS 47.32 and regulations adopted under AS 47.32” for “AS 47.35.019 or 47.35.021” in the third sentence of subsection (i).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that this section applies to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

Under sec. 12,
ch. 20, SLA 2006, the 2006 amendments of (a) and (b) of this section apply “to a child in need of aid proceeding that is pending before the court, that is on appeal to the court, or for which the time for appeal to the court has not yet passed on or after May 4, 2006.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Sec. 47.10.089.
Voluntary relinquishment of parental rights and responsibilities.

When a child is committed to the custody of the department under AS

47.10.080(c)(1)

or (3) or released under AS

47.10.080(c)(2)

, the rights of a parent with respect to the child, including parental rights to control the child, to withhold consent to an adoption, or to receive notice of a hearing on a petition for adoption, may be voluntarily relinquished to the department and the relationship of parent and child terminated in a proceeding as provided under this section.

A voluntary relinquishment must be in writing and signed by a parent, regardless of the age of the parent, in the presence of a representative of the department or in the presence of a court of competent jurisdiction with the knowledge and approval of the department. A copy of the signed relinquishment shall be given to the parent.

A voluntary relinquishment may be withdrawn within 10 days after it is signed. The relinquishment is invalid unless the relinquishment contains the right of withdrawal as specified under this subsection.

A parent may retain privileges with respect to the child, including the ability to have future contact, communication, and visitation with the child in a voluntary relinquishment executed under this section. A retained privilege must be in writing and stated with specificity.

Not less than 10 days after a voluntary relinquishment is signed, the court shall enter an order terminating parental rights if the court determines that termination of parental rights under the terms of the relinquishment is in the child’s best interest. If a parent has retained one or more privileges under (d) of this section, the court shall incorporate the retained privileges in the termination order with a recommendation that the retained privileges be incorporated in an adoption or legal guardianship decree.

A voluntary relinquishment may not be withdrawn and a termination order may not be vacated on the ground that a retained privilege has been withheld from the relinquishing parent or that the relinquishing parent has been unable, for any reason, to act on a retained privilege, except as provided in Rule 60(b), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

After a termination order is entered, a person who has voluntarily relinquished parental rights under this section may request a review hearing, upon a showing of good cause, to seek enforcement or modification of or to vacate a privilege retained in the termination order. The court may modify, enforce, or vacate the retained privilege if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that it is in the best interest of the child to do so.

After a termination order is entered and before the entry of an adoption or legal guardianship decree, a person who voluntarily relinquished parental rights to a child under this section may request a review hearing, upon a showing of good cause, to vacate the termination order and reinstate parental rights relating to that child. A court shall vacate a termination order if the person shows, by clear and convincing evidence, that reinstatement of parental rights is in the best interest of the child and that the person is rehabilitated and capable of providing the care and guidance that will serve the moral, emotional, mental, and physical welfare of the child.

A person who relinquished parental rights is entitled to the appointment of an attorney if a hearing is requested under (g), (h), or (j) of this section to the same extent as if the parent’s rights had not been terminated in a child-in-need-of-aid proceeding.

After a termination order is entered and before the entry of an adoption or legal guardianship decree, a prospective adoptive parent or a guardian of a child who is the subject of the adoption or guardianship decree may request, after providing notice as specified under this subsection, that the court decline to incorporate a privilege retained in a termination order and recommended for incorporation in an adoption or guardianship decree under (e) of this section. The request made under this subsection may only be considered by the court after providing at least 20 days’ notice by certified mail to the last known address of the person who has voluntarily relinquished parental rights to the child. The notice under this subsection must describe the request and explain that the recipient of the notice may submit a written statement under penalty of perjury to the court that the recipient either agrees with or opposes the request. The notice must also include the deadline for submitting the statement and the mailing address of the court. The court may decline to incorporate a retained privilege if the person who retained the privilege agrees with the request or if the court finds that it is in the child’s best interest.

History.

(§ 17 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For the text of the amendment of Rule 18(d)(1), Child in Need of Aid Rules, setting out a conforming court rule change consistent with this section, see § 54, ch. 64, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the text of the amendment of Rule 9(g), Alaska Adoption Rules, setting out a conforming court rule change consistent with (h) of this section relating to voluntary relinquishment of parental rights, see § 57, ch. 64, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the text of the amendment of Rule 13(a), Alaska Adoption Rules, setting out a conforming court rule change consistent with (e) of this section relating to the content of the court decree and findings supporting a voluntary relinquishment of parental rights, see § 58, ch. 64, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 60(b), ch. 64, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 enactment of this section has the effect of amending Rules 9 and 13, Alaska Adoption Rules, by requiring retained privileges to be set out in the relinquishment form and order and by providing additional procedures related to the relinquishment.
Section 60(c), ch. 64, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 enactment of this section has the effect of amending Rule 13, Alaska Adoption Rules, by authorizing review hearings for voluntary relinquishments.
Section 60(e), ch. 64, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 enactment of this section has the effect of amending Rule 18, Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, by providing that a relinquishment be in writing, allowing for the withdrawal of the relinquishment, allowing for the retention of certain privileges, and authorizing a review hearing before the entry of an adoption or legal guardianship decree.

Sec. 47.10.090.
Court records.

The court shall make and keep records of all cases brought before it.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]

Within 30 days after the date of a child’s 18th birthday or, if the court retains jurisdiction of a child past the child’s 18th birthday, within 30 days after the date on which the court releases jurisdiction over the child, the court shall order all the court’s official records pertaining to that child in a proceeding under this chapter sealed. A person may not use these sealed records unless authorized by order of the court upon a finding of good cause.

The name or picture of a child under the jurisdiction of the court may not be made public in connection with the child’s status as a child in need of aid unless authorized by order of the court or unless to implement the permanency plan for a child after all parental rights of custody have been terminated. This subsection does not prohibit the release of aggregate information for statistical or other informational purposes if the identity of any particular person is not revealed by the release.

The court’s official records under this chapter may be inspected only with the court’s permission and only by persons having a legitimate interest in them. A foster parent is considered to have a legitimate interest in those portions of the court’s records relating to a child who is placed by the department with the foster parent or who the department proposes for placement with the foster parent.

History.

(§ 10(3)(4) art I ch 145 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 124 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 90 SLA 1975; am § 20 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 130 SLA 1988; am § 56 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 98 SLA 1994; am § 12 ch 113 SLA 1994; am §§ 29 — 31, 55 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 34 ch 99 SLA 1998; am §§ 18, 19 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For similar provisions related to delinquent minors, see AS

47.12.300

.

For effect of the 1998 amendment to subsection (e) on the Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, see § 78, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the text of the amendment of Rule 22(c), Child in Need of Aid Rules, setting out a conforming court rule change consistent with the 2005 amendment of (d) of this section, see § 55, ch. 64, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, substituted reference to “child” for reference to “minor” throughout subsections (c) and (d); in subsection (c) substituted “unless authorized by order of the court upon a finding of good cause” for “for any purpose except that the court may order their use for good cause shown” at the end of the subsection; and in subsection (d) added the language beginning “or unless” to the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 61(b), ch. 64, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 amendment of (d) of this section has “the effect of changing Rule 22, Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, by allowing the disclosure of confidential information pertaining to a child, including a child’s name or picture to be made public in certain circumstances.”

Under § 62(b), ch. 64, SLA 2005, the 2005 amendments of (c) and (d) of this section apply “to all proceedings and hearings conducted on or after July 1, 2005.”

Sec. 47.10.092.
Disclosure to certain public officials and employees.

Notwithstanding AS

47.10.090

and

47.10.093

, a parent or legal guardian of a child subject to a proceeding under AS

47.10.005

—

47.10.142

may disclose confidential or privileged information about the child or the child’s family, including information that has been lawfully obtained from agency or court files, to the governor, the lieutenant governor, a legislator, the ombudsman appointed under AS 24.55, the attorney general, and the commissioner of health and social services, administration, or public safety, or an employee of these persons, for review or use in their official capacities. The Department of Health and Social Services and the Department of Administration shall disclose additional confidential or privileged information, excluding privileged attorney-client information, and make copies of documents available for inspection about the child or the child’s family to these state officials or employees for review or use in their official capacities upon request of the official or employee and submission of satisfactory evidence that a parent or legal guardian of the child has requested the state official’s assistance in the case as part of the official’s duties. A person to whom disclosure is made under this section may not disclose confidential or privileged information about the child or the child’s family to a person not authorized to receive it.

The disclosure right under (a) of this section is in addition to, and not in derogation of, the rights of a parent or legal guardian of a minor.

The obligations under (a) of this section remain in effect throughout the period that the child is in the custody of the department, including after the parent’s parental rights have been terminated with respect to the child, unless the child’s parent or legal guardian who made the disclosure under (a) of this section subsequently files a notice with the Department of Health and Social Services that the assistance of the state official or employee is no longer requested.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall notify an official identified under (a) of this section of the opportunity for a parent to file a grievance under AS

47.10.098

when the official is denied access to all or part of a requested record.

Each department shall respond to a request made by an official identified under (a) of this section within five working days after receiving the request, or by a later date specified in the request, by providing access to all or part of the information requested or by providing the specific citation to a federal or state law that prohibits disclosure of all or part of the information requested.

A person who discloses confidential or privileged information in violation of (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500 or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 2 ch 98 SLA 1994; am § 50 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1997; am § 35 ch 99 SLA 1998; am §§ 20, 21 ch 64 SLA 2005; am § 4 ch 20 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 38 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (c) and (d) were enacted as (d) and (e) and relettered in 2005, at which time former subsection (c) was relettered as subsection (e). Subsection (e) was enacted as (f) and relettered in 2006, at which time former (e) was relettered as (f).

Cross references. —

For effect of the 1998 amendment to subsection (a) on the Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, see § 78, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts. For similar provisions related to delinquent minors, see AS

47.12.320

.

Administrative Code. —

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, in subsection (a) made a stylistic change in the first sentence and, in the second sentence, substituted “Department of Health and Social Services and the Department of Administration” for “department” and inserted “, excluding privileged attorney-client information,”; and added subsections (d) and (e) [now (c) and (d)].

The 2006 amendment, effective May 4, 2006, added subsection (f) [now (e)].

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “discloses confidential or privileged information in violation of (a)” for “violates a provision” in subsection (f).

Editor’s notes. —

In connection with the 1998 amendment to subsection (a), § 81, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “TRANSITIONAL PROVISION; DISCLOSURE OF AGENCY RECORDS. (a) The Department of Health and Social Services may disclose information and make copies of documents available to state officials or employees as authorized under AS

47.10.092(a)

, as amended by sec. 35 of this Act, based on an appropriate request that was received before, on, or after September 14, 1998.

“(b) The Department of Health and Social Services, a parent, or a legal guardian may disclose information as authorized under AS

47.10.092(a)

, as amended by sec. 35 of this Act, regardless of when the information came into the possession or knowledge of the department, parent, or legal guardian and regardless of when the conduct or situation described in the information occurred.”

Under § 62(c), ch. 64, SLA 2005, the 2005 amendments to this section “apply to all information, records, and files created on or after July 1, 2005; however, if a file contains information and records that were created before July 1, 2005, that information and those records retain the confidentiality that they had under the law on June 30, 2005.”